Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201960-641.01
On-track equipment, defined.

On-track equipment means any railroad locomotive or any other car, rolling stock, equipment, or other device operated upon stationary rails either alone or coupled to other railroad locomotives, cars, rolling stock, equipment, or devices.

Laws 2019, LB81, § 3.